District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-4441

Acquisition of own capital stock.

Repealed.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1154, ch. 672, ch. III, § 40
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 24(d), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(e)(2), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-638.
1973 Ed., § 35-540.